Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0414

Voting requirements for members.

If a limited cooperative association has both patron and investor members, the following rules apply:

(1) The total voting power of all patron members may not be less than a majority of the entire voting power entitled to vote.

(2) Action on any matter is approved only upon the affirmative vote of at least a majority of:

(a) All members voting at the meeting unless more than a majority is required by RCW 23.100.0301 through 23.100.0307, 23.100.1001 through 23.100.1013, or 23.100.1201 through 23.100.1204 or the organic rules; and

(b) Votes cast by patron members unless the organic rules require a larger affirmative vote by patron members.

(3) The organic rules may provide for the percentage of the affirmative votes that must be cast by investor members to approve the matter.

[ 2019 c 37 s 414.]